Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5906
Complex nursing interventions; authorized; drugs, devices, biologicals, and supplements; list required; duties.

(1) An assisted-living facility may provide complex nursing interventions on a part-time or intermittent basis.

(2) Every person seeking admission to an assisted-living facility or the authorized representative of such person shall, upon admission and annually thereafter, provide the facility with a list of drugs, devices, biologicals, and supplements being taken or being used by the person, including dosage, instructions for use, and reported use.

(3) Every person residing in an assisted-living facility or the authorized representative of such person shall annually provide the facility with a list of drugs, devices, biologicals, and supplements being taken or being used by such person, including dosage, instructions for use, and reported use.

(4) An assisted-living facility shall not be subject to disciplinary action by the department for the failure of any person seeking admission to or residing at such facility or the authorized representative of such person to comply with subsections (2) and (3) of this section.

(5) Each assisted-living facility shall provide for a registered nurse to review medication administration policies and procedures and to be responsible for the training of medication aides at such facility.

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 50;

Laws 2018, LB439, § 7.
July 19, 2018